Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-529
Failure to file annual financial report; use of other reports.

(1) When the superintendent of a school district fails to file the annual financial report on or before the date required by subsection (3) of section 79-528, the State Department of Education shall use the annual financial report from the immediately preceding fiscal year for purposes of the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.

(2) For purposes of the final calculation of state aid pursuant to section 79-1065, the annual financial report for the most recently available complete data year shall be used.

Laws 2013, LB410, § 22;

Laws 2018, LB1081, § 7.
July 19, 2018
Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act, see section 79-1001.